Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1420
Limitation of liability.

(1) Unless otherwise agreed, a landlord, who conveys premises that include a dwelling unit subject to a rental agreement in a good faith sale to a bona fide purchaser, is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act as to events occurring subsequent to written notice to the tenant of the conveyance, but the landlord remains liable to the tenant for any property and money to which the tenant is entitled under section 76-1416, except that assignment of any security deposits or prepaid rents to a bona fide purchaser with written notice to the tenant shall serve to relieve the conveying landlord of any further liability under section 76-1416.

(2) Unless otherwise agreed, a manager of premises that include a dwelling unit is relieved of liability under the rental agreement and the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act as to events occurring after written notice to the tenant of the termination of his or her management.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 15.